Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1927.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4)(xxi) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is renumbered and the clause is amended by adding a subclause to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *(xxi) U sing a restaurant menu, including a printed menu, a posted menu, a display board menu, a drive-thru menu, a digital or electro nic menu, a QR code accessed menu or a menu shown on 123456789101112131415161718192021 an Internet website or application, to advertise, offer or sell a food or beverage item without clearly and conspicuously disclosing the item's price prior to selection. As used in this subclause, the term "restaurant" means a business that prepares and offers for sale food or beverages for consumption on or off the premises, including a bar, café, coffee shop, delicatessen, fast food establishment, food hall counter or similar facility or a food truck operating from a fixed location for sales to the public, but excluding a grocery, convenience or specialty-food retailer that does not prepare food to order.[(xxi)] (xxii) Engaging in any other fraudulent or deceptive conduct which creates a likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding.* * *Section 2. Section 3(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 3. Unlawful Acts or Practices; Exclusions.--(a) Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce as defined by subclauses (i) through [(xxi)] (xxii) of clause (4) of section 2 of this act and regulations promulgated under section 3.1 of this act are hereby declared unlawful. The provisions of this act shall not apply to any owner, agent or employe of any radio or television station, or to any owner, publisher, printer, agent or employe of an Internet service provider or a newspaper or other publication, periodical or circular, who, in good faith and without knowledge of the falsity or deceptive character thereof, publishes, causes to be published or takes part in the publication of such advertisement.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1927PN2411 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930